Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 4 Powers of Trust Companies

7-1-310.
Powers to act as fiduciary and in other representative capacities.

A trust company may act, alone or with others, as:

Fiduciary;

Investment advisor;

Custodian of property;

Agent or attorney in fact;

Registrar or transfer agent of securities;

Fiscal agent of the United States, a state or a public body thereof, a corporation, or a person; and

Treasurer of a public body or of a nonprofit corporation.

A trust company shall have, in respect to any capacity in which it may act pursuant to a power under subsection (a) of this Code section, all the rights and duties which a person has in such capacity under applicable laws and under the terms upon which the trust company is designated to act in such capacity.

Every bank and credit union operating pursuant to this chapter shall possess all of the rights, privileges, powers, and responsibilities herein conferred upon trust companies; provided, however, that no such bank or credit union shall exercise such powers and privileges without the prior written approval of the department after a careful consideration of the factors enumerated in Code Section 7-1-394, relating to the chartering of trust companies. Any bank exercising or partially exercising trust powers prior to February 27, 1976, authorized by its articles may continue to exercise or partially to exercise those powers to the extent approved by the department without the necessity of obtaining a new approval.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2817; Ga. L. 1917, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 2; Ga. L. 1920, p. 76, § 1; Code 1933, § 109-201; Code 1933, § 41A-1401, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 274, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 4; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

7-1-311.
Operations as a fiduciary.

Except as otherwise permitted by Code Section 7-1-315, a trust company in its capacity as fiduciary shall:

Segregate all property (other than items in the course of collection) held as a fiduciary from its nonfiduciary assets and keep separate records of all such fiduciary property for each account for which such property is held;

Hold property held as fiduciary in a form complying with applicable law;

Keep fiduciary funds awaiting investment or distribution in deposits in an authorized financial institution (including, in the case of a trust company which is also a bank, its own commercial department or the commercial department of an affiliate as provided in Code Section 7-1-289) which is insured or, to the extent of any deficiencies in insurance coverage, fully secured by a pledge or assignment of bonds or obligations of the United States, this state, or a public body of either or other obligations guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States, this state, or a public body of either or real estate loans secured by a first lien or security title to improved realty and insured pursuant to any title of the National Housing Act. The beneficial owners of such uninvested funds shall have a first and prior lien on such security;

Not be required to execute a bond or give any security required by the law of fiduciaries but may give its own bond and pledge or otherwise grant security interests in its assets as security for the faithful performance of its duties as fiduciary or as surety for such faithful performance by any cofiduciary where such is requested or otherwise required; and

Provide any oath or affirmation or any affidavit required of the trust company through an officer thereof acting on behalf of the trust company.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 484, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 108, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1965, p. 244, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 468, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1402, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1494, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 15.

Cross references.

Substitution of parties to contract generally, §

13-4-20

.

Impossibility as excuse for non-performance, §

13-4-21

.

U.S. Code.

The National Housing Act, referred to in paragraph (3) of this Code section, is codified generally as

12 U.S.C. § 1701

et seq.

7-1-312.
Nonfiduciary investments.

A trust company which is not a bank may, apart from its fiduciary activities, invest in stock and investment securities, except that it may not acquire or hold its own stock otherwise than pursuant to paragraphs (8) and (9) of Code Section 7-1-261.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1403, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-313.
Collective investment funds.

As used in this Code section, the term “collective investment fund” shall include a common trust fund and any other type of collective investment fund.

A trust company may establish and maintain collective investment funds for the investment or reinvestment of property which:

Is contributed by the trust company in a capacity in which it is authorized to act pursuant to Code Section 7-1-310; and

Is eligible for contribution to a collective investment fund under this Code section.

Property shall be eligible for contribution whenever the instrument, judgment, decree, or order under which the trust company holds the property does not prohibit investment in the type of collective investment fund involved, provided that, if the trust company holds the property under circumstances limiting it to investing the property in legal investments for fiduciaries, then it may invest the property only in a collective investment fund limited to assets authorized as legal investments for a fiduciary.

The department shall regulate the establishment, operation, and maintenance of collective investment funds. Such regulations of the department shall comply with the general standards for exercise of the regulatory power of the department under this chapter and, in addition, shall be designed to assure:

Ratably equal treatment of the participants in a fund by imposing minimum requirements for the method and frequency of valuation of participations in the fund, for the time and method of admission or withdrawals of participations in the fund, and for the determination of interests of participants in the assets and income of the fund; and

The competitive equality between trust companies and national banks exercising fiduciary powers with respect to the authority to establish and maintain collective investment funds to the extent compatible with the general purposes of this chapter.

No mistake made in good faith and in the exercise of due care in connection with the administration of a collective investment fund shall be deemed a violation of this Code section or of any other duty of the trust company if, promptly after discovery of the mistake, the trust company takes whatever action may be practicable in the circumstances to remedy the mistake.

Any other trust company or national bank with trust powers which is a member of an affiliated group (as defined in Section 1504 of the Internal Revenue Code) with a trust company maintaining collective investment funds may participate in one or more such funds as though they were maintained by the participating trust company. Such participation may be made pursuant to agreement providing for reasonable compensation for the trust company maintaining the fund or funds.

A trust company, in any capacity in which it may act under Code Section 7-1-310, may invest property collectively in accordance with the specific terms upon which it receives such property, without regard to the restrictions of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 442, §§ 2, 3, 6, 8, 13, 14; Ga. L. 1972, p. 816, §§ 2, 3; Code 1933, § 41A-1404, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 9.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that this Act is applicable to taxable years ending on or after March 11, 1987, and that a taxpayer with a taxable year ending on or after January 1, 1987, and before March 11, 1987, may elect to have the provisions of that Act apply.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, also provided that tax, penalty, and interest liabilities and refund eligibility for prior taxable years shall not be affected by that Act.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, also provided that provisions of the federal Tax Reform Act of 1986 and of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 which as of January 1, 1987, which were not yet effective become effective for purposes of Georgia taxation on the same dates as they become effective for federal purposes.

U.S. Code.

Section 1504 of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (f) of this Code section, is codified as

26 U.S.C. § 1504

.

7-1-314.
Purchase in fiduciary capacity of securities underwritten by syndicate including institution.

A trust company or a financial institution with fiduciary powers may, in its fiduciary capacity, purchase securities underwritten by a syndicate which includes the financial institution or an affiliate of the financial institution, provided such purchase is otherwise prudent, not prohibited by the instrument governing the fiduciary relationship, and not otherwise inconsistent with regulations issued by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-314

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 10; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1249, § 7.

7-1-315.
Satisfaction of fiduciary obligations respecting investment of funds awaiting investment or distribution and charging of fees.

A trust company complying with this Code section will be deemed to have satisfied its fiduciary obligations and duties with respect to:

The investment of fiduciary funds awaiting investment or distribution;

The charging of fees in connection therewith; and

The disclosure of policies, procedures, and fees in connection therewith.

A trust company may invest fiduciary funds awaiting investment or distribution in short-term, trust-quality investment vehicles, through the medium of a collective investment fund or otherwise. A trust company may also place fiduciary funds awaiting investment or distribution in deposits of the commercial department of such trust company, in the case of a trust company which is also a bank, or in deposits of an affiliate bank; provided, however, that the rate of interest paid on such deposits shall be at least equal to the rate paid by such department or affiliate bank on deposits of similar terms and amounts. A fiduciary shall have complied with this Code section if cash awaiting investment or distribution in excess of $1,000.00 is invested or deposited within 30 days of receipt or accumulation thereof. The provisions of this subsection shall apply notwithstanding any other law or rule restricting or limiting the investments of fiduciaries.

In addition to any other compensation to which it may be entitled, a trust company may, without necessity of obtaining the approval of any person or court, charge a reasonable fee for the temporary investment of fiduciary funds awaiting investment or distribution, which fee may be calculated upon the amount of such funds actually invested and upon the income produced thereby.

A trust company shall have complied with its duty to disclose fees and practices in connection with the investment of fiduciary funds awaiting investment or distribution if the trust company’s periodic statements set forth the trust company’s practice and method of computing fees.

This Code section shall be construed as a codification of existing law concerning the fiduciary duties of trust companies and not as a change in such law.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-315

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1494, § 2.

7-1-316.
Irrevocable letter of credit or pledge of securities for receivership contingency.

A trust company shall provide an irrevocable letter of credit or pledge securities acceptable to the department to defray the costs of a liquidation of the trust company in the event it should be placed into receivership.

The amount of the securities or the letter of credit required in this Code section shall be determined by the department as appropriate to defray the costs associated with receivership, provided that such amount shall be no less than $500,000.00.

Any letter of credit shall be:

Made payable to the department and issued by a Federal Home Loan Bank or a federally insured financial institution, approved by the department and authorized to do business in this state;

In a form and with terms acceptable by the department; and

Obtained from an entity in which the trust company has no financial interest.

Any pledged securities shall be held at a bank authorized to do business in this state, and any fees associated with holding such securities shall be the responsibility of the trust company.

If a trust company is placed in receivership, the department may, without regard to any priorities, preferences, or adverse claims, reduce the pledged securities or the letter of credit provided by a trust company to cash and, as soon as practicable, utilize the cash to defray the costs associated with receivership.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-316

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 8/HB 143.

7-1-317.
Minimal amount of capital.

The department may require, based on safety and soundness, that a trust company maintain a minimum amount of capital, provided that such amount shall in no event be less than $3 million. The department may alter the amount of capital required to be maintained by a trust company from time to time as may be necessary for the safe and sound operation of such trust company.

The department may consider the following in establishing the minimum amount of capital:

The nature and type of business to be conducted;

The nature and liquidity of assets to be held;

The amount of fiduciary assets to be under management of the trust company;

The type of fiduciary assets to be held and the depository for such assets;

The complexity of fiduciary duties and degree of discretion to be undertaken;

The competence and experience of management;

The extent and adequacy of internal controls;

The presence or absence of annual unqualified audits by an independent certified public accountant;

The reasonableness of business plans for retaining or acquiring additional equity capital;

The existence and adequacy of insurance to protect the clients, beneficiaries, and grantors of the trust company;

Any history of operating losses;

Any history of loss in relation to fiduciary or custodial accounts; and

The amount of support from the trust company’s parent or affiliate.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-317

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 8/HB 143.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Minimum capital requirements for trust companies, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Trust Companies, Rule 80-13-1-.02.

7-1-318.
Prohibition on pledging or creating a lien by trust companies; void actions.

No trust company shall pledge or create a lien on any of its assets except to secure:

The repayment of money borrowed; or

Trust accounts administered by the trust company.

An act, deed, conveyance, pledge, or contract in violation of this Code section shall be considered void.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-318

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 8/HB 143.